Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1718
Organization, defined.

Organization shall mean any corporation, association, limited liability company, partnership, society, firm, syndicate, trust, or other legal entity.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 18.